California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 security, together with property to which the lien imposed by Section 7872 attaches, is sufficient security to ensure payment of taxes equivalent to three times the estimated average monthly tax liability of the person. The amount of the security may be increased or decreased by the board at any time. Any security in the form of cash or insured deposits in banks and savings and loan institutions shall be held by the board in trust to be used solely in the manner provided for in this section and Section 7487. Any security in the form of a bond or bonds shall be duly executed by an admitted surety insurer, payable to the state, conditioned upon faithful performance of all the requirements of this part, and expressly providing for the payment of all taxes, penalties, and other obligations of the person arising out of this part. Security held by the board shall be released after a three-year period in which the person has filed all returns and paid all tax to the state or any amount of tax required to be
 collected and paid to the state within the time required.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 26.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7487.

If, at the time a person ceases to operate under this part, the board holds a security pursuant to Section 7486 in the form of cash, or insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions, the security when applied to the account of the taxpayer shall be deemed to be a payment on account of any liability of the taxpayer to the Controller on the date the person ceases to operate under this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 28.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Denial of License [7491. - 7493.]

7491.

The board may refuse to issue a license under this part:

(a) If the application therefor is filed by an applicant who formerly held any license under this part which, prior to the time of filing the application, has been revoked for cause by the board; or

(b) If the board determines that the application therefor is not filed in good faith or made by the real person in interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7492.

Before the refusal, the board shall grant the applicant a hearing and shall give him or her at least 10 days’ written notice of the time and place thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7493.

The notice shall be addressed to the applicant at his or her address as it appears in the records of the board, and shall be given in the manner prescribed in Section 7671 for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revocation of License [7505. - 7511.]

7505.

The board may revoke the license of any person who refuses or neglects to comply with any provisions of this part or any rule or regulation of the board prescribed and adopted under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.

The board may revoke any supplier’s license held by a person who does not engage in, or who discontinues, the removal, entry, or sale of motor vehicle fuel, producing of blended motor vehicle fuel, owning or holding inventory position of motor vehicle fuel, or owning or operating a refinery or terminal as any of the following:

(a) A blender, as defined in Section 7308.

(b) An enterer, as defined in Section
 7311.

(c) A position holder, as defined in Section 7332.

(d) A refiner, as defined in Section 7334.

(e) A terminal operator, as defined in Section 7340.

(f) A throughputter, as defined in Section 7341.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.

Before revoking any license the board shall notify the licensee to show cause within 10 days after the notice is given, why his or her license should not be revoked. The notice shall be given in the manner prescribed in Section 7671 for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7508.

The board may cancel any license issued under this part immediately upon surrender thereof but before revoking a license the board shall allow the person an opportunity to show cause as provided in Section 7507.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7509.

Upon revocation or cancellation of the license of the person or upon his or her cessation of business, all motor vehicle fuel remaining in his or her possession or ownership shall be deemed removed, entered, sold, delivered, or used and subject to jeopardy determination as provided in Section 7698 if, in the judgment of the board, it is necessary to ensure payment of the tax with respect to the removal, entry, sale, delivery, or use of the motor vehicle fuel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7510.

Subsequent to the revocation of the license of a person, the board shall reinstate the permit when the person pays the amount of tax determined, together with interest and penalties, fully complies with this part, and pays a fee of fifty dollars ($50) to the board for reinstatement. The fee shall not be subject to refund except as provided in Section 8126.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7511.

It is unlawful for any person to operate in this state after a license has been revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Licensing of Locations [7520. - 7520.]

7520.

Every person required to be licensed by the board shall provide the board with the names and addresses of all agents operating in this state, the location of all offices or other places of business in this state, and any other information as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Determinations and Payments [7651. - 7732.]



  ARTICLE 1. Returns, Reports, and Payments [7651. - 7658.5.]

7651.

Each supplier shall prepare and file with the board a return in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing the total number of gallons of motor vehicle fuel removed, sold, or entered within this state during each calendar month, or that monthly period ended during that calendar month as the board may authorize, the amount of tax due for the month covered by the return, and other information as the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part. The person shall file the return on or
 before the last day of the month following the monthly period to which it relates, together with a remittance payable to the Controller for the amount of tax due for that period less whatever amounts may have been paid theretofore for the same period because of returns, prepayment forms, and payments made on a weekly basis. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of the returns for other than monthly periods. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.5.

(a) Each terminal operator shall prepare and file with the board a report in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing, for the calendar month, or that monthly period ended during the calendar month as the board may authorize, the following:

(1) The name and license number of each person that is a position holder at each terminal it operates;

(2) The amount of motor vehicle fuel received at each terminal it operates;

(3) The identity of each position holder with respect to the rack removals of motor vehicle fuel from each terminal it operates and the volume and dates of the removals;

(4) The amount of motor vehicle fuel stored at each terminal it operates;

(5) The destination (by state) of all motor vehicle fuel removed at a terminal rack of each terminal it operates, to the extent that information has been provided to the terminal operator; and

(6) Any other information required by the board for the proper administration of this part.

The terminal operator shall file the report on or before the last day of the month following the
 monthly period to which it relates. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of the reports for other than monthly periods. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(b) Upon written approval of the board, a terminal operator may satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) above by executing and providing to the board a consent and authorization for the Internal Revenue Service to provide to the board under Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code, the return filed by the terminal operator under Section 48.4101-2 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The board may, in its sole discretion, rescind its approval and require a terminal operator to file reports as specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.7.

(a) Each pipeline operator and vessel operator shall prepare and file with the board a report in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing, for the calendar month, or that monthly period ended during the calendar month as the board may authorize, all of the following:

(1) The amount of motor vehicle fuel delivered to each terminal or refinery.

(2) The location of the terminal or refinery where the motor vehicle fuel was delivered.

(3) The date of delivery.

(4) Any other information required by the board for the proper administration of this part.

The pipeline operator and vessel operator shall file the report on or before the last day of the month following the monthly period to which it relates. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of the reports for other than monthly periods. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(b) Upon written approval of the board, a pipeline operator and vessel operator may satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) by executing and providing to the board a consent and
 authorization for the Internal Revenue Service to provide to the board under Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code, the return filed by the pipeline operator and vessel operator under Section 48.4101-2 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The board may, in its sole discretion, rescind its approval and require a pipeline operator and vessel operator to file reports as specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.8.

Each train operator shall prepare and file with the board a report in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing, for the calendar month, or that monthly period ended during the calendar month as the board may authorize, all of the following:

(a) The amount of motor vehicle fuel, alcohol, and aircraft jet fuel delivered into, out of, or within this state.

(b) The location
 where the motor vehicle fuel, alcohol, or aircraft jet fuel was delivered.

(c) The date of delivery.

(d) Any other information required by the board for the proper administration of this part. The train operator shall file the report on or before the last day of the month following the monthly period to which it relates. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of the reports for other than monthly periods. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 306, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.

(a) Each person subject to the tax imposed under Section 7361, on or before February 28, 2002, shall prepare and file with the board, on forms prescribed by the board, a return showing the total number of gallons of motor vehicle fuel owned by the person on January 1, 2002, for which a tax has not been imposed under Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301) as in effect on December 31, 2001, the amount of the tax imposed, and any other information that the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this
 part. The return shall be accompanied by a remittance payable to the Controller in the amount of tax due. 

(b) Any distributor, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 7361, who has tax-paid motor vehicle fuel in the bulk transfer/terminal system on January 1, 2002, which was purchased prior to January 1, 2002, shall report the tax-paid gallons on the subdivision (a) return. The amount of taxes paid on the tax-paid gallons shall constitute a credit against the amount of taxes due and payable on the subdivision (a) return, or on the supplier’s January 2002 return required under Section 7651, and for each succeeding return until the credit is fully utilized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 30.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.1.

On or before August 31, 2010, each person subject to the storage tax imposed under Section 7361.1 shall prepare and file with the board, in a form prescribed by the board, a return showing the total number of gallons of tax-paid motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline, owned by the person on July 1, 2010, the amount of the storage tax, and any other information that the board deems necessary for the proper
 administration of this part. The return shall be accompanied by a remittance payable to the Controller in the amount of tax due.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 6, Sec. 28.   (AB 105)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.2.

On or before January 1, 2018, each person subject to the storage tax imposed under Section 7361.2 shall prepare and file with the board, in a form prescribed by the board, a return showing the total number of gallons of tax-paid motor vehicle fuel owned by the person on November 1, 2017, the amount of the storage tax, and any other information that the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part. The return shall
 be accompanied by a remittance payable to the Controller in the amount of tax due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 188.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7655.

(a) Any person who fails to pay the amount of tax shown to be due by his or her return on or before the last day of the month following the monthly period to which it relates shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the tax, together with interest on that tax at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(b) Any supplier who fails
 to file a return in accordance with the due date set forth in Section 7651 shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the tax, exclusive of prepayments, with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(c) The penalties imposed by this section shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the tax for which the return is required, exclusive of any prepayments, for any one return.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7655.5.

(a) If the department finds, taking into account all facts and circumstances, that it is inequitable to compute interest at the modified adjusted rate per month or fraction thereof, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6591.5, interest shall be computed at the modified adjusted daily rate from the date on which the tax or prepayment was due until the date of payment, if all of the following occur:

(1) The payment of tax or the prepayment was made one business day after the date the tax or prepayment was due.

(2) The person was granted relief from all penalties that applied to that payment of tax or prepayment.

(3) The person files for an adjustment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “modified adjusted daily rate” means the modified adjusted rate per annum as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6591.5 determined on a daily basis by dividing the modified adjusted rate per annum by 365.

(c) For purposes of this section, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any day designated as a state holiday.

(d) This section shall not apply to any payment made pursuant to a deficiency determination, a determination where no return has been filed, or a jeopardy determination issued by the
 department.

(e) This section shall only apply to electronic payments or prepayments of taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 16.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7656.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the board for good cause may extend for not to exceed one month the time for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time if a request therefor is filed with the board within or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(b) (1) In the case of a disaster, the board, for a period not to exceed three months, may extend the time for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or before the period for which the extension may be granted.

(2) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means fire, flood, storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether or not resulting from natural causes.

(c) Any person to whom an extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the tax, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax would have been due without the extension to the date of
 payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   (AB 1559)   Effective September 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7656.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the Governor issues a state of emergency proclamation, the department may extend the time, for a period not to exceed three months, for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part for any person in an area identified in the state of emergency proclamation.

(b) If the department makes an extension pursuant to subdivision (a), any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation shall not be required to file a request for the extension. 

(c) The department may make the extension in subdivision (a) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration
 of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 13.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7657.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely report, return, or payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty provided by Sections 7655, 7659.5, 7659.6, 7659.9 7660, 7705, and 7713.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which that person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to
 paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the penalty for any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(d) The department shall establish criteria that provide for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 14.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7657.1.

(a) If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, the person may be relieved of the taxes imposed by this part and any penalty or interest added thereto.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, only if the
 board finds that all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person requested in writing that the board advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to tax under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request.

(2) The board responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to tax, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to tax.

(3) The liability for taxes applied to a particular activity or transaction which occurred before either of the following:

(A) Before the board rescinded or modified the advice so
 given, by sending written notice to the person of the rescinded or modified advice.

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the board’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, which renders the board’s earlier written advice no longer valid.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the board and a copy of the board’s written advice.

(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based.

(3) Any other information which the board may require.

(d) Only the person making the written request shall be entitled to rely on the board’s written advice to that person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7657.5.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the board, if: (1) A tax liability under this part was understated by a failure to file a return required to be filed under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed on a return, and the understatement of tax liability is
 attributable to one spouse; or any amount of the tax reported on a return was unpaid and the nonpayment of the reported tax liability is attributable to one spouse. (2) The other spouse establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment. (3) Taking into account whether or not the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for the deficiency in tax attributable to that understatement or nonpayment,then the other spouse shall be relieved of liability for tax (including
 interest, penalties, and other amounts) to the extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of tax.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar months subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any calendar month that is more than five years from the final date on the board-issued determination, five years from the return due date for nonpayment on a return, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), “reason to know” means
 whether or not a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section, with respect to a failure to file a return or an omission of an item from the return, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as a supplier entering, removing, or selling taxable motor vehicle fuel or an aircraft jet fuel dealer selling or using taxable aircraft jet fuel to which the understatement is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as a supplier or aircraft jet fuel dealer, then the attribution of applicable items of understatement shall be treated as community property. An erroneous deduction or credit shall be attributable to the spouse who caused that deduction or credit to be entered on the return.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the board, if,
 taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for any unpaid tax or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the board may relieve the other spouse of that liability.

(g) For purposes of this section, registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, have the same rights, protections, and benefits as provided by this section, and are subject to the same responsibilities, obligations, and duties as imposed by this section, as are granted to and imposed upon spouses.

(h) The relief provided by this section shall apply retroactively to liabilities arising prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section applicable retroactively as prescribed in subd. (h) and clarified in Sec. 60 of Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------

7658.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment was due to a disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the interest provided by Sections 7655, 7656, 7659.9, 7661, and 7706.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a person seeking to be relieved of the interest shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which that person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the interest for any person in an area
 identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 15.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7658.1.

(a) The board, in its discretion, may relieve all or any part of the interest imposed on a person by this part where the failure to pay tax is due in whole or in part to an unreasonable error or delay by an employee of the board acting in his or her official capacity.

(b) For purposes of this section, an error or delay shall be deemed to have occurred only if no significant aspect of the error or delay is attributable to an act of, or a failure to act by, the person.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based and any other information which the board may require.

(d) The board may grant relief only for interest imposed on tax liabilities that arise during taxable periods commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7658.5.

Every payment on a delinquent tax shall be applied as follows:

(a) First, to any interest due on the tax.

(b) Second, to any penalty imposed by this part.

(c) The balance, if any, to the tax itself.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Prepayments [7659. - 7659.8.]

7659.

The provisions of this article apply to suppliers required to file a supplier’s return pursuant to Section 7651.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.1.

Upon written notification by the board, any person whose estimated tax liability under this part averages nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) or more per month, as determined by the board, shall, without regard to the tax in any one month, make a prepayment as prescribed in this section. The prepayment requirement may be satisfied by making a prepayment of an amount not less than 95 percent of the tax liability for the month to which the prepayment applies or a prepayment not less than 95 percent of the amount of the tax
 liability reported for the previous month. Prepayments shall be made for the monthly periods designated by the board and during each succeeding monthly period until further notification by the board in writing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.2.

Except in the case of a person required to remit amounts due in accordance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 7659.9), for purposes of Section 7659.1, each prepayment shall be accompanied by a report of the amount of that prepayment in a form prescribed by the board and shall be filed with the board on or before the 15th day following each monthly period together with a remittance payable to the Controller of the amount due.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.3.

The amount of the prepayment shall constitute a credit against the amount of the taxes due and payable for the monthly period for which the prepayment was made and for each succeeding monthly prepayment or period until the credit is fully utilized.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.4.

In determining whether a person’s estimated tax liability averages nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) or more per month, the board may consider tax returns filed pursuant to this part as well as any information in the board’s possession or which may come into its possession.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.5.

Any person required to make a prepayment pursuant to Section 7659.1 who fails to make a timely prepayment but makes that prepayment before the last day of the month following the monthly period for which the prepayment was due, shall also pay a penalty of 6 percent of the amount of prepayment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.6.

Any person required to make a prepayment pursuant to Section 7659.1 who fails to make a prepayment before the last day of the month following the monthly period for which the prepayment became due and who files a timely return and payment for the monthly period for which the prepayment became due shall pay a penalty of 6 percent of the amount equal to 95 percent of the tax liability for the monthly period for which the required prepayment was not made.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.7.

(a) If the failure to make a prepayment as described in Section 7659.6 is due to negligence or intentional disregard of this part or authorized rules and regulations, the penalty shall be 10 percent, instead of 6 percent.

(b) If any part of a deficiency in prepayment is due to negligence or intentional disregard of this part or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of 10 percent of the deficiency shall be paid.

(c) The provisions of this section shall not apply to amounts subject to the provisions of Sections 7655, 7660, 7662, 7672, 7673, and 7726.

(d) The 10-percent negligence penalty shall become due and payable and shall be ascertained and determined in the same manner as the deficiency determination under Article 4 (commencing with Section 7670) of this chapter. The provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 7710) of this chapter shall be applicable with respect to the finality of the determination and the right of the supplier to petition for redetermination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.8.

Notification by the board, provided for in Section 7659.1, may be served personally or by mail in the manner prescribed in Section 7671 for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Payment by Electronic Funds Transfer [7659.9. - 7659.93.]

7659.9.

(a) Any person whose estimated tax liability under this part averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, as determined by the board pursuant to methods of calculation prescribed by the board, shall remit amounts due by an electronic funds transfer under procedures prescribed by the board.

(b) Any person whose estimated tax liability under this part averages less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per month may elect to remit
 amounts due by electronic funds transfer with the approval of the board.

(c) Any person remitting amounts due pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall perform an electronic funds transfer in compliance with the due dates set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 7651) and Article 1.1 (commencing with Section 7659). Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated, if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(d) Any person remitting taxes by electronic funds transfer shall, on or before the due date of the remittance, file a return for the preceding reporting period in the
 form and manner prescribed by the board. Any person who fails to timely file the required return shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of taxes, exclusive of prepayments, with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any person required to remit taxes pursuant to this article who remits those taxes by means other than appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the taxes incorrectly remitted.

(2) A person required to remit prepayments pursuant to this article who remits a prepayment by means other than an appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 6 percent of the prepayment incorrectly remitted.

(f) Except as provided by Sections 7659.5 and 7659.6, any person who fails to pay
 any tax to the state or any amount of tax required to be paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 7660) or Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 7670), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the tax or amount of tax, in addition to the tax or amount of tax, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax or the amount of tax required to be paid became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(g) In determining whether a person’s estimated tax liability averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, the board may consider tax returns filed pursuant to this part and any other information in the board’s possession.

(h) Except as provided in subdivision (i), the